Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1406
Lien; attachment; when.

(1) The agricultural production input lien attaches to:

(a) The existing crops upon the land where a furnished agricultural chemical was applied or, if crops are not planted, the next production crop where a furnished agricultural chemical was applied within sixteen months following the last date on which the agricultural chemical was applied;

(b) The crops produced from furnished seed;

(c) The crops produced, harvested, or processed using a furnished petroleum product or furnished electricity. If the crops are grown on leased land and the lease provides for payment in crops, the lien does not attach to the lessor's portion of the crops. The lien continues in crop products and proceeds, except the lien does not continue in grain after a cash sale; or

(d) All livestock consuming the feed and continues in livestock products and proceeds.

(2) An agricultural production input lien attaches when the agricultural production input is furnished by the supplier to the purchaser.

Laws 1987, LB 101, § 6.